Hawaii, session 2026, GM1345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Hawaii Braille Literacy Education Act.
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that literacy skills are
fundamental to success in education, employment, and life for
all members of society, including individuals with low vision
and blindness, Braille is a tactile writing system that allows
low vision and blind individuals to read by touch, using a
system of raised dots that represent letters, numbers, and
symbols. Braille literacy skills are widely understood as
essential for low vision and blind students to actively learn,
seek and maintain remunerative employment, engage in cultural
enrichment and hobbies, and access opportunities in life
regardless of disability.
According to a 2018 study reported in the Journal of
Blindness Innovation and Research, "individuals who were primary
braille readers since childhood had greater life satisfaction,
self-esteem, and job satisfaction than individuals who reported
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO

Page 2 1894
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
not using braille as their primary reading medium during
childhood." Additionally, the study reported that "findings
support the premise that braille literacy is key to life
satisfaction and self-esteem in addition to academic and job
success" and that those who are braille literate are more likely
to gain high-quality employment.
According to the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention, more than twenty-four thousand people statewide
report low vision or blindness. The exceptional support branch
of the department of education helps complex areas and schools
in planning and implementing programs that increase achievement
for students with disabilities, including students with low
vision or blindness. Presently, one hundred seventy students in
kindergarten through twelfth grade are registered with the
American Printing House for the Blind to receive special
education materials. However, only about ten per cent of those
registered have braille services in their special education
programs, creating a significant gap for students to receive
equitable educational opportunities. With limited resources
contingent upon individual student needs, a proactive approach
is imperative to ensure equity for students with low vision or
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiiiniMi

Page 3
H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
blindness and help those students succeed in the classroom and
prepare for future careers and life goals.
The legislature further finds that it is in the interest of
the State to make braille literacy educational services
available to all students and members of the greater educational
community. Therefore, it is necessary for the State to promote
braille instruction and timely access to braille instructional
materials for low vision or blind students, parents, teachers,
and other school personnel.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the
department' of education to;
(1) Include the instruction of braille and provision of
braille instructional materials under certain
circumstances;
(2) Provide braille literacy support services;
(3) Cooperate with the department of human services when
requested to submit information necessary to maintain
a register of the blind in the State;
(4) Provide comprehensive information about braille
literacy services, assistive technology devices, and
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO 3
liliMlllllllllllllll

Page 4
H.B. NO.
11.^ g
C.D. 1
assistive technology services, including educational
programming options; and
(5) Participate in the development of section 504 plans
and individualized education programs.
SECTION 3. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART BRAILLE SERVICES
§302A- Policy. It is a policy of the State to promote
braille literacy and support the provision of braille
educational services needed for eligible low vision or blind
students to fully participate in school and prepare students for
life beyond the classroom.
§302A- Definitions. For the purposes of this part:
"Braille" has the same meaning as defined in section
302A-442.5.
"Braille educational services" means:
(1) Assessment of an eligible low vision or blind student
to evaluate the student's reading and writing ability,
needs, and appropriate reading and writing media,
including assessment of the student's current and
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO
iniiinniiniiRMiiiiiiiii

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
future needs for instruction in braille or the use of
braille;
(2) Instruction in braille reading and writing; and
(3) Provision of braille instructional materials.
"Braille instructional materials" means print instructional
materials, as defined in section 302A-442.5, that are produced
in braille.
"Eligible low vision or blind student" means an eligible
student, as defined in section 302A-442.5.
"Individualized education program" and "individualized
education program team" have the same meanings as defined in the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. section
1414(d)), as amended.
"Section 504 plan" and "section 504 plan team" mean the
documentation of needs and provision of services developed by a
team assembled to ensure equal educational opportunity to
students with disabilities pursuant to section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. section 794), as amended.
§302A- Low vision or blind students; braille
instruction; braille instructional materials; educational
services. (a) The department shall ensure that the section 504
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO
liimiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
plan or individualized education program for an eligible low
vision or blind student provides each student with the
opportunity to receive braille educational services in
accordance with this part.
(b) Any section 504 plan or individualized education
program prepared for an eligible low vision or blind student
shall consider results of the initial or most recent assessments
of the student’s reading and writing ability, needs, and
appropriate reading and writing media, using one or more reading
assessment tools, which have been approved by the department as
validated for use with eligible low vision or blind students.
(c) Braille educational services that include braille
instruction and braille instructional materials shall be
provided under an individualized education program prepared for
the student, unless the individualized education program team
finds that braille instructional services or braille
instructional materials are not appropriate as determined
pursuant to subsection (e).
(d) Each section 504 plan or individualized education
program that includes the provision of braille instructional
materials shall include an assurance that the materials or
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO

iiiiiiiiiiHBiiniigiiiiiii

Page 7 H.B. NO. T
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
substitute braille instructional materials, when original
materials have not arrived at the student's school, shall be
provided concurrently with the distribution of print
instructional materials for all other students in accordance
with section 302A-442.5(e).
(e) Subsection (c) may not apply if consideration of the
initial or most recent assessments required under subsection (b)
support a determination by the section 504 plan team or
individualized education program team that braille instruction
or braille instructional materials are not appropriate for the
student, as documented in the section 504 plan or individualized
education program. This determination shall be supported by
documentation of:
(1) The student's visual functioning behaviors and skills
in school, including but not limited to ocular motor
function and near, distance, and field of vision, to
ensure that the student's visual needs are addressed;
(2) Results of reading and writing skills and media
assessments, identifying the assessment tools and
methods used;
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Results of assessments of the student's current and
future needs for braille instruction and the use of
braille;
(4) Identification of all accommodations and services
provided to meet the student's reading and writing
needs resulting from the student's low vision or
blindness; and
(5) The date of any new assessment agreed upon by the
section 504 plan team or individualized education
program team.
§302A- Braille literacy support services. (a) Braille
literacy support services shall be provided by the department
and shall include:
(1) One or more reading media assessment tools validated
for use with low vision or blind students;
(2) Braille instructional materials as needed to fulfill
section 504 plans and individualized education
programs; provided that preference shall be given to
braille instructional materials provided by in-state
suppliers when possible; and
2026-3299 HB1894 GDI HMSO

Page 9 H.B. NO. S‘:
C.D. 1
(3) Authoritative information about the efficacy of
braille educational services.
(b) The department shall:
(1) Cooperate with the department of human services when
requested to submit information necessary to maintain
the register of the blind in the State pursuant to
section 347-6;
(2) Provide eligible low vision or blind students’ parents
or legal guardians, and the students, as appropriate,
with comprehensive information about braille literacy
services, assistive technology devices, and assistive
technology services, including educational programming
options; and
(3) Participate in the development of section 504 plans
and individualized education programs.
(c) The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
to carry out the purposes of this part."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to
implement the Hawaii Braille Literacy Education Act.
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO

Page 10
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
education for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION'S. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3299 HB1894 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO 1894
I
O
O
b
o
b
APPROVED this 13th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1894, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1894, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai ‘ i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
178-26